New York, session 2025-2026, S4250.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 1 of section 501-b of the vehicle and traffic 2 law, as added by chapter 644 of the laws of 2002, paragraphs (c) and (d) 3 as amended by chapter 403 of the laws of 2009, is amended to read as 4 follows: 5 1. In addition to the restrictions contained in subdivision five of 6 section five hundred one of this article, no holder of a class DJ or 7 class MJ learner's permit shall: 8 (a) operate a motor vehicle with any front seat occupants other than 9 the supervising driver; 10 (b) operate a motor vehicle unless every occupant of such vehicle is 11 properly restrained by a safety belt or child safety seat in accordance 12 with the provisions of subdivision three-a of section twelve hundred 13 twenty-nine-c of this chapter; 14 (c) operate a motor vehicle with more than one passenger who is under 15 the age of twenty-one and who is not a member of such holder's immediate 16 family, provided, however, that the provisions of this paragraph shall 17 not apply when such holder is accompanied by a duly licensed parent, 18 guardian, person in a position of loco parentis, driver education teach- 19 er or driving school instructor; 20 (d) be eligible for issuance of a class DJ, MJ, D or M license unless 21 such permit has been valid for at least six months. Any time period in 22 which such class DJ or MJ learner's permit has been suspended or revoked 23 shall not be counted in determining the length of time that such 24 learner's permit has been valid; and EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD07944-01-5 S. 4250 2 1 (e) operate a motor vehicle without a sign, visible to both oncoming 2 and following traffic, indicating that such vehicle is being driven by a 3 new driver. Such sign shall be in such form and distributed in such 4 manner as provided by the commissioner upon issuance of such learner's 5 permit. 6 § 2. This act shall take effect on the first of September next 7 succeeding the date on which it shall have become a law.